Massachusetts, session 194th, S838.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds and confirms all of the following:-
Whereas, decades of research indicates wireless can impair health, with numerous studies
showing damage to DNA, to fertility, and increases in cancer, in addition to a growing list of
studies showing harm to mental health, diabetes risk, increased dementia, etc.
Whereas, wireless facilities are a fire risk due to overloaded poles, poorly maintained
equipment, and electrical engineering failures causing dangerous electrical fires near homes that
block escape routes and may require an hour or so before utilities shut off power and allow
firefighters to put out the fire with resulting loss of emergency call access as power is gone as
has been especially problematic in large fires.
of 5

Whereas, the Pittsfield Board of Health in April 2022 issued an an Emergency Order to
Verizon to turn off a cell tower because of sick residents.
Whereas, the Massachusetts Association for Boards of Health now includes cell tower
risks in the last four pages of the Legal Handbook and Public Health Guidebook for
Massachusetts Boards of Health (2021) and also filed an amicus brief in support the injured
Pittsfield citizens (referenced above).
Whereas, in 2020, Boston in FCC’s 19-226 docket stated: 'Boston believes that the
concerns of the public are real and that the Commission has done a disservice to itself, local
government, consumers, and even the wireless industry in failing to understand and respond to
the broadly shared mistrust of the safety of RF emissions.'
Whereas, the Federal Communications Commission has routinely undercut local control,
promoted hasty installation, mandated residential antennas, and allowed small 5G antennas
serving other users to be placed on private residences without permit under the satellite TV or
“OTARD” rule.
Resolved, that the policy goals of this act shall be to provide a minimum floor of
insurance requirements for wireless infrastructure within the commonwealth to serve as an
incentive for insurers to regulate and require safety.
SECTION 15. Chapter 111 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2021 Official Edition
is hereby amended by inserting after section 5O the following section:-
5O1. (a) Definitions. As used in this section, the following words shall have the
following meanings:
of 5

“Microcells” are the largest and most powerful small cell, often installed by network
operators on utility poles, traffic lights, and sign, and include a “small wireless facility” as
defined I 47 C.F.R. § 1.6002(l), as may be amended or superseded.
“Mobile service” means the same as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153(33), as may be amended.
“Radio communication” or “radio services” means the transmission by radiofrequency of
writing, signs, signals, pictures, and sounds of all kinds, including all instrumentalities, facilities,
apparatus, and services (among other things, the receipt, forwarding, and delivery of
communications) incidental to such transmission.
“Structure” means a pole, tower, base station, or other building, whether or not it has an
existing antenna facility, that is used or to be used for the provision of personal wireless service
(whether on its own or commingled with other types of services).
“Telecommunications service” means the offering of telecommunications for a fee
directly to the public, or to such classes of users as to be effectively available directly to the
public, regardless of the facilities used.
(b) Within the Commonwealth, all providers of transmitting antennas for
telecommunications services or for video programming or television broadcast through mobile or
radio services are required to carry insurance or, if insurance cannot be obtained, an equivalent
bond placed into escrow with an independent escrow agent approved by the either the
municipality, if permitted by the municipality, or with an independent escrow agent approved by
the radiation regulatory agency. The insurance or the bond must at minimum fulfills the
following conditions:
of 5

(1) Insurance is provided by a licensed third party provider, and not a self-insured
indemnity substitute provided by the applicant.
(2) If a municipally permitted antenna, the insurance or bond must name the
municipality, including its’ elected or appointed officials, commission members, officers,
representatives, agents, and employees as additional insureds.
(3) Coverage shall at minimum include the following:
(i) Commercial general liability and property damage insurance on an “occurrence basis”
with limits no less than $5,000,000 aggregate for a structure or $1,000,000 for a single microcell
antenna or $500,000 for a single antenna falling under the Over-the-Air-Reception-Device
regulations set by the Federal Communications Commission, to cover per occurrence bodily
injury, property damage, personal injury, advertising injury, premises liability, products liability,
contractual liability, and broad form property damage. The policy shall contain no exclusions for
(A) contractual liability; (B) cross liability exclusion for claims or suits by one insured against
another; (C) products/ completed operations liability; or (D) pollution including electromagnetic
pollution; (E) explosion, fire, or collapse; or (F) contain any other exclusion contrary to the
intent of this section.
(ii) When relevant, include automobile liability covering automobile accident caused by
the antenna provider’s autos, or if the owner has no owned autos, by that of its agents and others
allowed access onto its property, with a limit no less than $1,000,000 per accident for bodily and
property damage.
of 5

(iii) When relevant, evidence of workers compensation and employer’s liability insurance
with a limit of no less than $2,000,000 per accident for bodily injury or disease, including for
pollution and electromagnetic pollution.
(c) Exception to the insurance requirement described in subsection (b) shall be made for
personal digital devices and home or business appliances with transmitting antennas.
of 5